Hawaii, session 2025, SB19.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the department of land and natural resources, division of aquatic resources' mission is to manage, conserve, and restore the State's unique aquatic resources and ecosystems for present and future generations.  The State faces numerous increasing threats to its streams, estuaries, and reefs from invasive species, habit degradation, land-based sources of pollution, reduced freshwater flow, and disasters.  These in turn have adversely impacted the fishing and gathering practices of local communities. The purpose of this Act is to support the important work of the division of aquatic resources by funding various positions within the division. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $551,064 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to establish and fund the following positions within the department of land and natural resources, division of aquatic resources: (1)  $71,016 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) aquatic biologist V position for permitting and environmental review; (2)  $63,096 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) aquatic biologist IV position for permitting and environmental review; (3)  $71,016 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) aquatic biologist V position for environmental response to emergencies; (4)  $71,016 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) aquatic biologist V position for aquatic invasive species; (5)  $63,096 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) aquatic biologist IV position for noncommercial fisheries; (6)  $63,096 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) aquatic biologist IV position for Molokai; (7)  $58,296 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) aquatic biologist III position for Molokai; and (8)  $90,432 for two full-time equivalent (2.0 FTE) fishery technician IV positions for Molokai. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________